Alabama, session 2026rs, HB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
72 Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
73 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
74 $1,200,000 from the Personnel Fund to the State Personnel
75 Department for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
76 Section 2. In addition to all other appropriations
77 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
78 $34,000,000, estimated, in federal funds from the American
79 Rescue Plan Act - Small Business Credit Initiative Fund to the
80 Department of Finance for the fiscal year ending September 30,
81 2026. These funds may be delegated through memoranda of
82 agreement to the Alabama Innovation Corporation or other
83 entity so designated by the Department of Finance.
84 Section 3. In addition to all other appropriations
Page 3

Section 3. In addition to all other appropriations
HB217 INTRODUCED
85 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
86 $588,612 from the Federal Stimulus Fund to Alabama Medicaid
87 Agency for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
88 Section 4. In addition to all other appropriations
89 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
90 $16,000,000 from the Alabama Energy Infrastructure Fund to the
91 State Industrial Development Authority for the fiscal year
92 ending September 30, 2026.
93 Section 5. In addition to all other appropriations
94 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
95 $50,000,000 from the Strategic Energy Infrastructure
96 Development Fund to the State Industrial Development Authority
97 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
98 Section 6. In addition to all other appropriations
99 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
100 $3,600,000 from the Administrative Office of Courts Federal
101 and Local Funds Fund to the Unified Judicial System for the
102 fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law
103 to the contrary, the funds appropriated under this section may
104 be spent on salaries and personnel costs and for other general
105 operations of the Unified Judicial System.
106 Section 7. In addition to all other appropriations
107 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
108 $2,300,000 from the Court Automation Fund to the Unified
109 Judicial System for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
110 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the funds
111 appropriated under this section may be spent on salaries and
112 personnel costs and for other general operations of the
Page 4

personnel costs and for other general operations of the
HB217 INTRODUCED
113 Unified Judicial System.
114 Section 8. In addition to all other appropriations
115 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
116 $1,000,000 from the Advanced Technology and Data Exchange Fund
117 to the Unified Judicial System for the fiscal year ending
118 September 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
119 the funds appropriated under this section may be spent on
120 salaries and personnel costs and for other general operations
121 of the Unified Judicial System.
122 Section 9. In addition to all other appropriations
123 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
124 $4,100,000 from the State Judicial Administration Fund to the
125 Unified Judicial System for the fiscal year ending September
126 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the funds
127 appropriated under this section may be spent on salaries and
128 personnel costs and for other general operations of the
129 Unified Judicial System.
130 Section 10. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
131 2026, up to $22,137,949 shall be transferred from the
132 Refundable Tax Credit Fund to the Legislative Council Fund.
133 Section 11. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
134 2026, $13,000,000 shall be transferred from the Real Property
135 Management Fund to the Legislative Council Fund.
136 Section 12. In addition to all other appropriations
137 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated up
138 to $35,137,949 from the Legislative Council Fund to the
139 Legislative Council for construction and related expenses for
140 the new State House for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
Page 5

the new State House for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
HB217 INTRODUCED
141 Section 13. In addition to all other appropriations
142 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
143 $1,000,000 from the Vaping and Licensing Enforcement Fund to
144 the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for fiscal year
145 ending September 30, 2026.
146 Section 14. In addition to all other appropriations
147 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated up
148 to $1,000,000 from the Consumable Hemp Product Compliance Fund
149 to the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for fiscal
150 year ending September 30, 2026.
151 Section 15. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
152 this act or any other act, any amounts from appropriations for
153 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
154 state agencies in this act which were unexpended and reverted
155 on September 30, 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the
156 respective offices for the fiscal year beginning October 1,
157 2026.
158 Section 16. This act shall become effective immediately
159 upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or its
160 otherwise becoming law.
Page 6